District of Columbia statutes.
47-2301.01

Subchapter subject to the International Fuel Tax Agreement.

The Provisions of this subchapter shall be subject to the provisions of the International Fuel Tax Agreement as required by subchapter II of this chapter.

Sept. 18, 1998, D.C. Law 12-153, § 2(b), 45 DCR 3853

History

1981 Ed., § 47-2301.1.

Prior Codifications